District of Columbia statutes.
23-552

Government appeals.

In addition to any other right to appeal, the United States or the District of Columbia, as the case may be, shall have the right to appeal from an order granting a motion to suppress made under section 23-551 or from the denial of an application for an order of approval, if the United States or the District of Columbia, as the case may be, shall certify to the judge or other official granting such motion or denying the application that the appeal is not taken for purposes of delay. Appeal shall be taken within thirty days after the date the order was entered and shall be diligently prosecuted.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 625, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
This section is referenced in § 23-556.
1981 Ed., § 23-552.
1973 Ed., § 23-552.